test/src/morphology/N-F-С_А-распутье_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - распутье M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      распутье+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: распу́тье
      распутье+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: распу́тье
      распутье+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: распу́тья
      распутье+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: распу́тье
      распутье+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: распу́тью
      распутье+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: распу́тьем
      распутье+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: распу́тья
      распутье+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: распу́тья
      распутье+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: распу́тий
      распутье+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: распу́тьях
      распутье+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: распу́тьям
      распутье+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: распу́тьями
